incubator/apertium-ru-cu/apertium-ru-cu.ru.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюя'`</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="существительное"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="прилагательное"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="наречие"/>
    
    <sdef n="f"      c="женский род"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="мужской род"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="средний род"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="общий род"/>

    <sdef n="ani"    c="одушевлённое существительное"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="едиственное число"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="множественное число"/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="именительный"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="родительный"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="дательный"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="винительный"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="творительный"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="местный"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="звательный"/>
    <sdef n="prp"    c="предложный"/>
    <sdef n="indecl" c="несклоняемый"/>

    <sdef n="prn"    c="местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="определительное местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="неопределённое местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="указательныое местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="вопросительное местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="отрицательное местоимение"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="притяжательное местоимение"/>

    <sdef n="pprep"  c=""/>

    <sdef n="ij"     c="междометие"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="первое лицо"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="второе лицо"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="третье лицо"/>

    <sdef n="pr"     c="предлог"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="соединительный союз"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="сопоставительный союз"/>
    
    <sdef n="imperf" c="несовершенный вид"/>
    <sdef n="perf"   c="совершенный вид"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- [n.0] виски__n -->
    <pardef n="виски__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.la] молот__n -->
    <pardef n="молот__n">
      <e c="[m.la]">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ов</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.la/ani] автор__n -->
    <pardef n="автор__n">
      <e c="[m.la]">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ов</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ов</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.la^] стул__n -->
    <pardef n="стул__n">
      <e c="m.la^">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ья</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ья</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьев</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьях</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьям</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьями</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="виски"><i>ви'ски</i><par n="виски__n"/></e>
    <e lm="метро"><i>метро'</i><par n="виски__n"/></e>
    <e lm="меню"><i>меню'</i><par n="виски__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кафе"><i>кафе'</i><par n="виски__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пальто"><i>пальто'</i><par n="виски__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абажур"><i>абажу'р</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абонемент"><i>абонеме'нт</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="абрикос"><i>абрико'с</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автобус"><i>авто'бус</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="август"><i>а'вгуст</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автомат"><i>автома'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автоответчик"><i>автоотве'тчик</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="амбар"><i>амба'р</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ананас"><i>анана'с</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="анекдот"><i>анекдо'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="апельсин"><i>апельси'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аппетит"><i>аппети'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="арбуз"><i>арбу'з</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ассортимент"><i>ассортиме'нт</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="базар"><i>база'р</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="балет"><i>бале'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="балкон"><i>балко'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="банан"><i>бана'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="баран"><i>бара'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бассейн"><i>бассе'йн</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="батон"><i>бато'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="берет"><i>бере'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бизнес"><i>бизне'с</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="билет"><i>биле'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бифштекс"><i>бифште'кс</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бокал"><i>бока'л</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="букет"><i>буке'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бульон"><i>бульо'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="буран"><i>бура'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бутерброд"><i>бутербро'д</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="буфет"><i>буфе'т</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бюстгальтер"><i>бюстга'льтер</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вариант"><i>вариа'нт</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вагон"><i>ваго'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="велосипед"><i>велосипе'д</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="взгляд"><i>взгля'д</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="взор"><i>взо'р</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вид"><i>ви'д</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="виноград"><i>виногра'д</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вкус"><i>вку'с</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="возраст"><i>во'зраст</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вокзал"><i>вокза'л</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="компьютер"><i>компью'тер</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кран"><i>кра'н</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="молот"><i>мо'лот</i><par n="молот__n"/></e>
    <e lm="автор"><i>а'втор</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="агент"><i>аге'нт</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="адвокат"><i>адвока'т</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="администратор"><i>администра'тор</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аист"><i>а'ист</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="актёр"><i>актёр</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="араб"><i>ара'б</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="банкир"><i>банки'р</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бармен"><i>ба'рмен</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бизнесмен"><i>бизнесме'н</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="блондин"><i>блонди'н</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="боров"><i>бо'ров</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="брюнет"><i>брюне'т</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="верблюд"><i>верблю'д</i><par n="автор__n"/></e>
    <e lm="стул"><i>сту'л</i><par n="стул__n"/></e>
